Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Chapter 5 Dentists
63-5-124. Grounds for denial, suspension or revocation of licenses — Examinations — Investigations of reports — Civil penalties — Costs — Oaths and subpoenas.

The board has the power and it is its duty to deny, suspend, revoke or otherwise restrict or condition the license of, assess a civil penalty for each separate violation against or otherwise lawfully discipline the holder of any license to practice dentistry or any certificate to practice a dental specialty, any license to practice dental hygiene or practice as a registered dental assistant, whenever the licensee or certificate holder is guilty of violating any of the provisions of this chapter or of the following acts or offenses:

Unprofessional, dishonorable or unethical conduct;

A violation or attempted violation, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate, this chapter or any lawful order of the board issued pursuant thereto or any criminal statute of this state;

Making false or misleading statements or representations, being guilty of fraud or deceit in obtaining admission to practice or in being guilty of fraud or deceit in the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene or as a registered dental assistant;

Gross health care liability or a pattern of continued or repeated health care liability, ignorance, negligence or incompetence in the course of professional practice;

Habitual intoxication or personal misuse of any drugs or the use of intoxicating liquors, narcotics, controlled substances, controlled substance analogues or other drugs or stimulants, such as, but not limited to, nitrous oxide sedation, in such manner as to adversely affect the person's ability to practice dentistry, dental hygiene or as a registered dental assistant;

Conviction of a felony, conviction of any offense under state or federal drug laws, or conviction of any offense involving moral turpitude. However, an action taken under this subdivision (a)(6) shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 1, part 1 of this title;

Making or signing in one's professional capacity any certificate that is known to be false at the time one makes or signs such certificate;

Dispensing, prescribing or otherwise distributing any controlled substance or any other drug not in the course of professional practice, or not in good faith to relieve pain and suffering or not to cure an ailment, physical infirmity or disease;

Engaging in the practice of dentistry, dental hygiene or as a registered dental assistant when mentally or physically unable to safely do so;

Solicitation by agents or persons of professional patronage or profiting by the acts of those representing themselves to be agents of the licensee or the certificate holder;

Division of fees or agreeing to split or divide fees received for professional services with any person for bringing or referring a patient;

Conducting the practice of dentistry so as to permit directly or indirectly an unlicensed person to perform services or work that under this chapter can be done legally only by persons licensed to practice dentistry or dental hygiene or as a registered dental assistant;

Professional connection or association with any person, firm or corporation in any manner in an effort to avoid and circumvent this chapter, or lending one's name to another for the illegal practice of dentistry by such person;

Claiming to the public to be a specialist in some particular branch of dentistry without being certified by the board as such;

Payment or acceptance of commissions in any form or manner on fees for professional services, references, consultations, pathological reports, radiographs, prescriptions or on other services or articles supplied to patients;

Having work done by or obtaining work from a dental laboratory without issuing a written work order as provided in § 63-5-108;

Giving of testimonials, directly or indirectly, concerning the supposed virtue of secret therapeutic agents or proprietary preparations, such as remedies, vaccines, mouth washes, dentifrices or other articles or materials that are offered to the public, claiming radical cure or prevention of diseases by their use;

Any other unprofessional or unethical conduct that may be specified by the board by the means of rules and regulations duly published and promulgated by the board or the violation of any provision of this chapter;

A dentist shall not, on behalf of that dentist, that dentist's partner or associate or any other dentist affiliated with that dentist or that dentist's facility, use or participate in the use of any form of public communication containing a false, fraudulent, misleading or deceptive statement or claim;

Moreover, the fact of promulgation of any forms of public communication covered or prohibited in this section or the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder shall be prima facie evidence that the dentist named either used or permitted the use of the public communication;

A licensed dentist is authorized to use personal professional cards, appointment cards, announcements and related materials and appropriate signs and listings indicating the dentist's office and specialty in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the board;

Dispensing, prescribing or otherwise distributing any controlled substance, controlled substance analogue or other drug to any person in violation of any law of the state or of the United States; or

Disciplinary action against a person licensed to practice dentistry or dental hygiene or registered to practice as a dental assistant by another state or territory of the United States for any acts or omissions that would constitute grounds for discipline of a person licensed or registered in this state. A certified copy of the initial or final order, or other equivalent document memorializing the disciplinary action from the disciplining state or territory, shall constitute prima facie evidence of a violation of this section and shall be sufficient grounds upon which to deny, restrict or condition licensure/registration or renewal and/or discipline a person licensed in this state.

In enforcing this section, the board shall, upon probable cause, have the authority to compel an applicant or license or certificate holder to submit to a mental and/or physical examination, by a designated committee of at least three (3) practicing physicians, including a psychiatrist where a question of mental condition is involved. The applicant or license or certificate holder may have an independent physical or mental examination, which examination report shall be filed with the board for consideration. The committee will submit a report of its findings to the board for use in any hearing that may thereafter ensue.

The board may, upon finding of probable cause, require a dentist, dental hygienist or dental assistant to complete drug and/or alcohol treatment through a program designated by, or contracting with, the board. The board in its discretion is authorized to share information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda or other data at the program director's request. Information shared between the board and the program director shall be deemed not to violate laws requiring confidentiality of investigations or peer review records protected under § 63-5-131.

The board, on its own motion, may investigate any report indicating that a dentist, dental hygienist or dental assistant is or may be in violation of this chapter. Any dentist, dental hygienist, dental assistant, dental or dental related society or association, or any other person who in good faith reports to the board any information that a dentist, dental hygienist or dental assistant is or may be in violation of any provisions of this chapter, is not subject to suit for civil damages as a result thereof.

In assessing a civil penalty pursuant to this chapter, the board should consider the following:

The harm or potential harm of the violation to the public health and welfare;

The extent to which the public was exposed to such harm or potential harm;

The rate, duration and severity of the violations;

The value of the penalty as a deterrent to future violations;

Attempts by the violator to mitigate the harm to the public; and

Such other specific criteria as the board may wish to establish by duly promulgated regulation.

The board, pursuant to duly promulgated rules, may, whenever a final order is issued after a disciplinary contested case hearing that contains findings that a licensee or other person has violated any provision of this chapter, assess the costs directly related to the prosecution of the case, including investigatory costs, against the licensee or person.

Any elected officer of the board or any duly appointed or elected chair has the authority to administer oaths to witnesses. Upon probable cause being established, the board, by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the members to which the board is entitled, may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents and records.

Service of a subpoena issued by the board shall be made by the sheriff of the county of residence of the licensee or person upon whom the subpoena is served.

A licensee or person served by subpoena shall have thirty (30) days to request in writing a hearing before the board for the sole purpose of making a special appearance to quash or modify the subpoena. The subpoena for attendance of the person or the production of books and records shall be stayed until the board votes upon the request to quash or modify the subpoena. A majority vote of the members to which the board is entitled is required to quash or modify a subpoena.

A motion to appeal from a decision by the board regarding a request to quash or modify a subpoena shall be made to the chancery court in Davidson County within fifteen (15) days of such decision.

If any witness fails or refuses to obey a subpoena issued by it, the board is authorized to make application to any court of record in this state within the jurisdiction of which the witness is found or resides; and the court shall have power to attach the body of the witness and compel the witness to appear before the board and give testimony or produce books, records or papers as ordered. Any failure to obey the court order may be punished by the court issuing the order as a civil contempt.

Each witness who appears before the board by order of the board shall receive for attendance the compensation provided by law for attendance of witnesses in a court of record, which shall be paid from the funds of the board in the same manner as all other expenses of the board are paid.

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 26; 1963, ch. 107, § 3; 1969, ch. 29, § 10; 1978, ch. 824, § 18; 1981, ch. 99, § 13; T.C.A., § 63-554; Acts 1984, ch. 608, § 4; 1985, ch. 120, § 8; 1986, ch. 501, §§ 2, 3; 1988, ch. 635, § 18; 1990, ch. 1031, §§ 25, 26; 2000, ch. 927, § 6; 2001, ch. 330, §§ 8, 9; 2002, ch. 771, § 12; 2012, ch. 798, § 36; 2012, ch. 848, §§ 69, 70; 2018, ch. 745, § 25.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2000, ch. 927, § 7 provided that any increased expenditures resulting from the amendment to this section by the act, which added subsections (e) and (f), shall be paid from funds allotted to the board of dentistry by the commissioner of finance and administration pursuant to § 63-5-119(a).

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added the second sentence in (a)(6).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 46. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Criminal background checks for health care providers, § 63-1-116.

Discipline relating to unauthorized practice, §§ 63-5-116, 63-5-126.

Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

Payment of costs of investigation and prosecution, § 63-1-144.

Rules and regulations regarding sanctions for violations, § 63-1-146.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

Attorney General Opinions. The board of dentistry has authority to issue administrative subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents prior to the commencement of an administrative action, OAG 01-055, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (4/10/01).

63-5-125. Administrative procedures.

All proceedings for disciplinary action against a licensee or certificate holder under this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 27; 1981, ch. 99, § 14; T.C.A., § 63-555.

Law Reviews.

Review of Administrative Decisions by Writ of Certiorari in Tennessee (Ben H. Cantrell), 4 Memphis State U. L. Rev. 19.

63-5-126. Enjoining unlawful practice.

The board, in addition to the powers and duties expressly granted by this chapter in the matter of suspension or revocation of a license and in the matter of the refusal to issue a certificate, is authorized and empowered to petition any circuit or chancery court having jurisdiction to enjoin any person who is practicing or attempting to practice dentistry or dental hygiene without possessing a valid license to so practice and to enjoin any person, firm or corporation from performing any act or rendering any service that constitutes the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene as defined in § 63-5-108. No injunction bond shall be required of the board.

Jurisdiction is conferred upon the circuit and chancery courts of the state to hear and determine such causes as chancery causes and to exercise full and complete jurisdiction in such injunctive proceedings.

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 28; T.C.A., § 63-556; Acts 1990, ch. 1031, § 27.

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

63-5-127. District attorneys general to assist board.

The board at all times has the power to call upon the district attorneys general for the state in the various districts to assist the board. It is the duty of all district attorneys general throughout the state to assist the board, upon its request, in any suit for injunction or prosecution instituted by the board without charge or additional compensation to the district attorneys general.

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 29; T.C.A., § 63-557.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. L. Rev. 477.

63-5-128. Criminal penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of § 63-5-107(a) commits a Class B misdemeanor.

After being convicted of any violation of § 63-5-107(a), any person who again violates § 63-5-107(a) commits a Class E felony.

Any person who has been enjoined by a court of competent jurisdiction from performing any acts or rendering any services that constitute the practice of dentistry as defined in § 63-5-108, who thereafter willfully violates the terms of the injunction by again performing such acts or rendering such services, commits a Class E felony.

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 30; T.C.A., § 63-558; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 82, 83, 112; 1991, ch. 143, § 3.

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

Penalties, §§ 63-1-123, 63-1-134.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6A Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 58; 20 Tenn. Juris., Physicians and Surgeons, § 5.

63-5-129. Retirement.

Any person licensed to practice dentistry or dental hygiene in this state who has retired or may hereafter retire from such practice in this state is not required to register as required by this chapter; provided, that such person files with the board an affidavit on a form to be furnished by the board, which affidavit states the date on which such person retired from such practice and other such facts as tend to verify such retirement as the board deems necessary. If such person thereafter reengages in the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene in this state, such person shall apply for registration with the board as provided by this chapter.

Acts 1965, ch. 216, § 2; 1978, ch. 824, § 19; T.C.A., § 63-559; Acts 1990, ch. 1031, § 28.

Cross-References. Retirement, § 63-1-111.

63-5-130. Armed forces or public health service.

Any person licensed to practice dentistry or dental hygiene in this state who is an officer in the commissioned dental corps of the army, navy, air force or the public health service of the United States shall not be required to register as required in this chapter. Such person shall file with the board an affidavit on a form to be furnished by the board, which affidavit shall state the date on which such person entered the army, navy, air force or the public health service of the United States and such other facts as tend to verify such service as the board shall deem necessary. When such person resigns or is honorably discharged from one (1) of the aforementioned services and engages in the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene in this state or any other state, such person shall, within thirty (30) days, apply for registration with the board as provided for in this chapter.

Acts 1965, ch. 216, § 3; T.C.A., § 63-560.

63-5-131. Immunity of peer review committee from liability — Confidentiality.

As used in this section, “peer review committee” or “committee” means any committee, board, commission or other entity constituted by any statewide dental association or local dental society for the purpose of receiving and evaluating dental acts of other dentists or dental auxiliary personnel or their personal conduct as it relates to the performance of their professional duties.

Any dentist who serves on any peer review committee or on any other committee is immune from liability with respect to any action taken by the dentist in good faith and without malice as a member of such committee, board, commission or other entity.

Dentists, dental hygienists and registered dental assistants, members of boards of directors or trustees of any publicly supported or privately supported hospital or other such provider of health care, or any other individual appointed to any committee, as such term is described in subsection (a), are immune from liability to any patient, individual or organization for furnishing information, data, reports or records to any such committee or for damages resulting from any decision, opinions, actions and proceedings rendered, entered or acted upon by such committees undertaken or performed within the scope or functions of the duties of such committees, if made or taken in good faith and without malice and on the basis of facts reasonably known or reasonably believed to exist.

All information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda or other data furnished to any such peer review committee or other entity and any findings, conclusions or recommendations resulting from the proceedings of such committee or other entity are privileged. The records and proceedings of any such committee or other entity are confidential and shall be used by such committee or other entity and the members thereof only in the exercise of the proper functions of the committee or other entity and shall not become public record nor be available for court subpoena or discovery proceedings. Nothing contained in this subsection (d) applies to records, documents or information otherwise available from original sources, such records, documents or information not to be construed as immune from discovery or use in any civil proceeding solely due to presentation to the committee.

Acts 1974, ch. 656, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-561; Acts 1985, ch. 71, § 7; 1990, ch. 1031, § 29; 1992, ch. 859, § 2.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

63-5-132. Inactive licenses to perform pro bono services.

The board of dentistry shall establish by rule an inactive license category that allows dentists to perform services without compensation only for those persons receiving services from organizations that have received a determination of exemption under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. Such inactive license category shall not authorize any other practice of dentistry.

Acts 1997, ch. 345, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, referred to in this section, is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).

63-5-133. Dental referral service.

A dental referral service shall not participate in the advertising of, or operate, a dental referral service unless it meets all of the following requirements:

Its patient referrals result from patient-initiated responses to the dental referral service's advertising;

It discloses to any prospective patient in its advertising that participating dentists have paid a fee for participation in the service;

It does not impose a fee on participating dentists dependent on the number of referrals or amount of professional fees paid by the patient to the dentist; and

It duly registers with the board, providing all information reasonably required by the board.

Participating dentists shall not enter into an agreement to accept for dental care or treatment a person referred or recommended by a dental referral service unless the dental referral service meets all the requirements of subsection (a). Participating dentists shall charge no more than their usual and customary fees to any patient so referred or recommended.

“Dental referral service” is a person, firm, partnership, association, corporation, agent or employee of any of the foregoing that engages in any business or service for profit that in whole or in part includes the referral or recommendation of persons to a dentist for any form of dental care or treatment;

“Participating dentist” is a dentist duly licensed under this chapter who has paid a fee to a dental referral service in order to be included in its referral service.

A dental referral service that advertises shall include in each advertisement legible or audible language, or both, a disclaimer containing all the following statements or information:

The advertisement is paid for by participating dentists who have paid a fee to participate; and

No representation is made about the quality of the dental services to be performed or expertise of the participating dentists, and that participating dentists are not more or less qualified than dentists who are not participating in the service.

Dental referral service advertisements shall not do any of the following:

Advertise or solicit patients in a manner that contains a false, fraudulent, misleading or deceptive statement in any material respect;

Publish or circulate, directly or indirectly, any false, fraudulent, misleading or deceptive statement as to the skill or methods of practice of any participating dentist;

Contain a statement or make a recommendation that the dental referral service provides referrals to the most qualified dentists or dental practice; or

Advertise a review process or a screening that misleads the public into thinking a participating dentist has obtained special recognition or joined a selective group of licensed dentists by being a participating dentist in the dental referral service.

Acts 1998, ch. 1025, § 1.

Cross-References. Advertisement pertaining to board certification and specialty, § 63-1-145.

63-5-134. Special volunteer license for practice in free health clinic — Exemption from fees — Renewal.

A dentist or a dental hygienist licensed pursuant to this chapter under a special volunteer license who is a medical practitioner, as defined by § 63-1-201, engaged in practice at a free health clinic shall not be subject to license fees under this chapter. The board of dentistry may issue a special volunteer license, as such license is defined in § 63-1-201, to qualified applicants without fee or charge. Such license shall be for a period of two (2) years and may be renewed on a biennial basis.

Acts 2004, ch. 579, § 4.